Massachusetts, session 194th, H1737.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 266 of the General Laws, as appearing in 2016 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 95 the following new section:-
Section 95A.
In this section, “historic home” shall mean any dwelling house listed listed in the State
Register of Historic Places established and maintained by the Massachusetts Historical
Commission pursuant to G. L. c. 9, section 26C or identified by a plaque identifying the
homestead as an historic homestead pursuant to G. L. c. 9, section 27D.
Whoever willfully, intentionally and without right removes items, including, but not
limited to, copper gutters, copper wiring, aluminum or brick; displaces, destroys, defaces, mars
of 2

or injures the walls, wainscoting or any other part of any historical home, or the appurtenances
there of, by cutting, breaking, writing or otherwise, shall be punished by a fine of not less than
$100 and not more than $1000 or by imprisonment for not more than 2 years. Any person
convicted under the provisions of this section shall, in addition to the fine assessed, reimburse
the historic home owner for the total amount of damage incurred.
of 2